morphotactics.lexc
Multichar_Symbols

%{synIn%}
%{synUn%}
%{synİn%}
%{DOUB%}
%{rEÜ%}
%{rT%}
%{rK%}
%{rÇ%}
%{synÜn%}
%{rP%}
%{rEİ%}
%{rAI%}
%{synIv%}
%{rAU%}
%{synUv%}
%{E%}
%{synİv%}
%<Num%:Pl%>
%{A%}
%<Poss%:No%>
%<Poss%:1s%>
%(%{I%}%)
%<Poss%:2s%>
%<Poss%:3s%>
%(s%)
%{I%}
%(n%)
%<Poss%:1p%>
%<Poss%:2p%>
%<Poss%:3p%>
%<NC%>
%<Num%:Sg%>
%<Case%:Nom%>
%<Case%:Dat%>
%(y%)
%<Case%:Abl%>
%{D%}
%<Case%:Ins%>

%<Case%:Acc%>
%<Case%:Loc%>
%<Case%:Gen%>
%<NOM%>
%<NPRED%>
%<Dim%>
%{C%}
%{K%}
%<Occup%>
%<With%>
%<Without%>
%<State%>
%<Rltd%>
%<Like1%>
%<Like2%>
%<Bec%>
%<IsWhen%>
%<Tuple%>
%<Ord%>
%<AgtR%>
%<InfA%>
%<Inf1%>
%<Inf2%>
%<AgtP%>
%<AgtF%>
%<InfF%>
%<AgtA%>
%<AgtL%>
%<Inf3%>
%<AgtI%>
%<While%>
%<After1%>
%<Since%>
%<Untill%>
%<After2%>
%<KeepDo%>
%<EasyDo%>
%<AlmostDo%>
%(%{A%}%)
%<Bfr%>
%<Equ%>
%<Rel%>
%<Fam%>
%<Fam%>%<NOM%>%<Num%:Sg%>
%<ADV%>
%<Caus%>
%<Psv%>
%<VS%>
%<Rflx%>
%<Rcpr%>
%<Actv%>
%<Pasv%>
%<Pol%:Pos%>
%<Abil%>
%<Pol%:Neg%>
%<Prbl%>
%<Tns%:Opt%>
%<Tns%:Cond%>
%<Tns%:Past%>
%<Tns%:Necc%>
%<Tns%:Pres%>
%<Tns%:Iprf%>
%<Tns%:Fut%>
%<Tns%:Narr%>
%<Tns%:Imp%>
%<Prsn%:3p%>
%<Q%>
%{SPC%}
%<Cpl%:Aor%>
%<Prsn%:1s%>
%<Prsn%:2s%>
%<Prsn%:3s%>
%<Prsn%:1p%>
%<Prsn%:2p%>
%<Cpl%:Narr%>
%<Tns%:Aor%>
%<AsIf%>
%<Cpl%:Past%>
%<Cpl%:Cond%>


LEXICON Nom'

%<Num%:Sg%>:%- Sg;
%<Num%:Pl%>:%-l%{A%}r Pl;
%<IsWhen%>:%-%(y%)ken Adv_CAT;
%<STATE%>:%-l%{I%}%{K%} Nom_CAT;


LEXICON Sg

%<Poss%:No%>:%- Poss1;
%<Poss%:1s%>:%-%(%{I%}%)m Poss1;
%<Poss%:2s%>:%-%(%{I%}%)n Poss1;
%<Poss%:3s%>:%-%(s%)%{I%}%(n%) Poss1;
%<Poss%:1p%>:%-%(%{I%}%)m%{I%}z Poss1;
%<Poss%:2p%>:%-%(%{I%}%)n%{I%}z Poss1;
%<Poss%:No%>:%- Poss2;
%<Poss%:1s%>:%-%(%{I%}%)m Poss2;
%<Poss%:2s%>:%-%(%{I%}%)n Poss2;
%<Poss%:3p%>:%-l%{A%}r%{I%} Poss1LAR;
%<NC%>:%-%(s%)%{I%}%(n%) NC2;


LEXICON Poss1

%<Case%:Nom%>:%- Case3;
%<Case%:Dat%>:%-%(y%)%{A%} Case3;
%<Case%:Abl%>:%-%{D%}%{A%}n Case3;
%<Case%:Ins%>:%-%(y%)l%{A%} Case3;
Case;


LEXICON Poss2

 Poss2Deriv;
%<Case%:Nom%>:%- Case3;
%<Case%:Dat%>:%-%(y%)%{A%} Case3;
%<Case%:Abl%>:%-%{D%}%{A%}n Case3;
%<Case%:Ins%>:%-%(y%)l%{A%} Case3;
Case;


LEXICON Poss2Deriv

%<Fam%>%<NOM%>%<Num%:Sg%>:%-l%{A%}r Sg;


LEXICON Case3

Pred1_CAT;
CaseDeriv;
#;


LEXICON Pl

%<Poss%:No%>:%- Poss1LAR;
%<Poss%:1s%>:%-%(%{I%}%)m Poss1LAR;
%<Poss%:2s%>:%-%(%{I%}%)n Poss1LAR;
%<Poss%:3s%>:%-%(s%)%{I%}%(n%) Poss1LAR;
%<Poss%:2p%>:%-%(%{I%}%)n%{I%}z Poss1LAR;
%<Poss%:1p%>:%-%(%{I%}%)m%{I%}z Poss1LAR;
%<Poss%:3p%>:%-%(%{I%}%)%(n%) Poss1LAR;
%<NC%>:%-%(s%)%{I%}%(n%) NC1;


LEXICON Poss1LAR

%<Case%:Dat%>:%-%(y%)%{A%} Case3;
%<Case%:Abl%>:%-%{D%}%{A%}n Case3;
%<Case%:Ins%>:%-%(y%)l%{A%} Case3;
%<Case%:Nom%>:%- CaseNom;
Case;


LEXICON CaseNom

CaseDeriv;
Pred2_CAT;
#;


LEXICON Case2

Pred1_CAT;
Case2Deriv;
#;


LEXICON Case1

#;


LEXICON Case

%<Case%:Loc%>:%-%{D%}%{A%} Case2;
%<Case%:Gen%>:%-%(n%)%{I%}n Case2;
%<Case%:Acc%>:%-%(y%)%{I%} Case1;
 CaseDeriv2;


LEXICON CaseDeriv2

%<Fam%>:%-gil Nom'_CAT;
%<Equ%>:%-%{C%}%{A%} Adv_CAT;


LEXICON NC1

%<Case%:Dat%>:%-%(y%)%{A%} Case3;
%<Case%:Abl%>:%-%{D%}%{A%}n Case3;
%<Case%:Ins%>:%-%(y%)l%{A%} Case3;
%<Case%:Nom%>:%- CaseNom;
Case;


LEXICON NC2

%<Case%:Nom%>:%- Case3;
%<Case%:Dat%>:%-%(y%)%{A%} Case3;
%<Case%:Abl%>:%-%{D%}%{A%}n Case3;
%<Case%:Ins%>:%-%(y%)l%{A%} Case3;
Case;


LEXICON Nom'_CAT

%<NOM%>: Nom';


LEXICON Pred1_CAT

%<NPRED%>: Pred1;


LEXICON Case2Deriv

%<Rel%>:%-ki Nom'_CAT;


LEXICON CaseDeriv

%<Bec%>:%-l%{A%}ş DIr_Il_CAT;


LEXICON Pred2_CAT

%<NPRED%>: Pred2;


LEXICON Pred1

%<Prsn%:1s%>:%-%(y%)%{I%}m P2;
%<Prsn%:2s%>:%-s%{I%}n P2;
%<Prsn%:1p%>:%-%(y%)%{I%}z P2;
%<Prsn%:2p%>:%-s%{I%}n%{I%}z P2;
%<Prsn%:3p%>:%-l%{A%}r P2;
%<Cpl%:Narr%>:%-%(y%)m%{I%}ş Ca1;
%<Cpl%:Past%>:%-%(y%)%{D%}%{I%} Ca2;
%<Cpl%:Cond%>:%-%(y%)s%{A%} Ca2;
%<Prsn%:3p%>:%-l%{A%}r P5;
%<Cpl%:Aor%>:%-%{D%}%{I%}r Ca4;
%<Q%>:%-%{SPC%}m%{I%} Q3;
%<Prsn%:3s%>:%- P6;

LEXICON P6

%<Cpl%:Aor%>:%-%{D%}%{I%}r Ca3;


LEXICON Pred2

%<Prsn%:1s%>:%-%(y%)%{I%}m P2;
%<Prsn%:2s%>:%-s%{I%}n P2;
%<Prsn%:1p%>:%-%(y%)%{I%}z P2;
%<Prsn%:2p%>:%-s%{I%}n%{I%}z P2;
%<Prsn%:3p%>:%-l%{A%}r P2;
%<Cpl%:Narr%>:%-%(y%)m%{I%}ş Ca1;
%<Cpl%:Past%>:%-%(y%)%{D%}%{I%} Ca2;
%<Cpl%:Cond%>:%-%(y%)s%{A%} Ca2;
%<Cpl%:Aor%>:%-%{D%}%{I%}r Ca4;
%<Q%>:%-%{SPC%}m%{I%} Q3;
%<Prsn%:3s%>:%- P6;


LEXICON Nom

Nom';
%<Dim%>:%-%{C%}%{I%}%{K%} Nom'_CAT;
%<Occup%>:%-%{C%}%{I%} Nom'_CAT;
%<With%>:%-l%{I%} Nom'_CAT;
%<Without%>:%-s%{I%}z Nom'_CAT;
%<State%>:%-l%{I%}%{K%} Nom'_CAT;
%<Rltd%>:s%{A%}l Nom'_CAT;
%<Like1%>:%-%(%{I%}%)ms%{I%} Nom'_CAT;
%<Dim%>:%{C%}%{A%}ğ%{I%}z Nom'_CAT;
%<Like2%>:%(%{I%}%)mtra%{K%} Nom'_CAT;


LEXICON ADV

%<Pred%> Pred1;
#;


LEXICON NumDeriv

%<Tuple%>:%-%{I%}z Nom_CAT;
%<Ord%>:%-%(%{I%}%)nc%{I%} Nom_CAT;
Nom_CAT;


LEXICON TAMP1Deriv

%<AgtR%>:%-%(y%)%{I%}c%{I%} Nom_CAT;
%<InfA%>:%-%{D%}%{I%}%{K%} Nom_CAT;
%<Inf1%>:%-m%{A%} Nom_CAT;
%<Inf2%>:%-m%{A%}%{K%} Nom_CAT;
%<AgtP%>:%-m%{I%}ş Nom_CAT;
%<AgtF%>:%-%(y%)%{A%}c%{A%}%{K%} Nom_CAT;
%<InfF%>:%-%(y%)%{A%}c%{A%}%{K%} Nom_CAT;
%<AgtA%>:%-%(y%)%{A%}n Nom_CAT;
%<AgtL%>:%-%(y%)%{A%}s%{I0 Nom_CAT;
%<Inf3%>:%-%(y%)%{I%}ş Nom_CAT;
%<AgtI%>:%-%(%{I%}%)yor Nom_CAT;
%<While%>:%-%(y%)%{A%}r%{A%}%{K%} Adv_CAT;
%<After1%>:%-%(y%)%{I%}nc%{A%} Adv_CAT;
%<Since%>:%-%(y%)%{A%}l%{I%} Adv_CAT;
%<Untill%>:%-%(y%)%{I%}nc%{A%}y%{A%} Adv_CAT;
%<After2%>:%-%(y%)%{I%}p Adv_CAT;
%<KeepDo%>:%-%(y%)%{A%}dur VR_CAT;
%<EasyDo%>:%-%(y%)%{I%}ver VR_CAT;
%<AlmostDo%>:%-%(y%)%{A%}yaz VR_CAT;


LEXICON TAMP2Deriv

%<AgtA%>:%-z Nom_CAT;
%<KeepDo%>:%-%(y%)%{A%}dur VR_CAT;
%<EasyDo%>:%-%(y%)%{I%}ver VR_CAT;
%<AlmostDo%>:%-%(y%)%{A%}yaz VR_CAT;


LEXICON TAMP3Deriv

%<AgtA%>:%-%(%{A%}%)r Nom_CAT;
%<AgtA%>:%-%(%{I%}%)r Nom_CAT;
%<Bfr%>:%-m%{A%}d%{A%}n Adv_CAT;
%<KeepDo%>:%-%(y%)%{A%}dur VR_CAT;
%<EasyDo%>:%-%(y%)%{I%}ver VR_CAT;
%<AlmostDo%>:%-%(y%)%{A%}yaz VR_CAT;


LEXICON Nom_CAT

%<NOM%>: Nom;


LEXICON DIr_Il_CAT

%<VS%>: DIr_Il;


LEXICON Adv_CAT

%<ADV%>: ADV;


LEXICON VR_CAT

%<VS%>: VR;


LEXICON DIr_Il

%<Psv%>:%-%(%{I%}%)l Pasv_CAT;
%<Caus%>:%-%{D%}%{I%}r CausA_CAT;
VR;


LEXICON Pasv_CAT

%<VS%>: Pasv;


LEXICON CausA_CAT

%<VS%>: CausA;


LEXICON VR

%<Rflx%>:%-%(%{I%}%)n RaR_CAT;
%<Rcpr%>:%-%(%{I%}%)ş RaR_CAT;
%<Actv%>: APP;


LEXICON DIr_In

%<Psv%>:%-%(%{I%}%)n Pasv_CAT;
%<Caus%>:%-%{D%}%{I%}r CausA_CAT;
VR;


LEXICON DIr_In_CAT

%<VS%>: DIr_In;


LEXICON It_Il

%<Psv%>:%-%(%{I%}%)l Pasv_CAT;
VR;
%<Caus%>:%-%(%{I%}%)t CausB_CAT;


LEXICON It_Il_CAT

%<VS%>: It_Il;


LEXICON CausB_CAT

%<VS%>: CausB;


LEXICON It_In

%<Psv%>:%-%(%{I%}%)n Pasv_CAT;
VR;
%<Caus%>:%-%(%{I%}%)t CausB_CAT;


LEXICON It_In_CAT

%<VS%>: It_In;


LEXICON Ir_Il

%<Psv%>:%-%(%{I%}%)l Pasv_CAT;
%<Caus%>:%-%(%{I%}%)r CausA_CAT;
VR;


LEXICON Ir_Il_CAT

%<VS%>: Ir_Il;


LEXICON Ir_In

%<Psv%>:%-%(%{I%}%)n Pasv_CAT;
%<Caus%>:%-%(%{I%}%)r CausA_CAT;
VR;


LEXICON Ir_In_CAT

%<VS%>: Ir_In;


LEXICON Ar_Il

%<Psv%>:%-%(%{I%}%)l Pasv_CAT;
%<Caus%>:%-%{A%}r CausA_CAT;
VR;


LEXICON Ar_Il_CAT

%<VS%>: Ar_Il;


LEXICON Ar_In

%<Psv%>:%-%(%{I%}%)n Pasv_CAT;
%<Caus%>:%-%{A%}r CausA_CAT;
VR;


LEXICON Ar_In_CAT

%<VS%>: Ar_In;


LEXICON Il

%<Psv%>:%-%(%{I%}%)l Pasv_CAT;
VR;


LEXICON Il_CAT

%<VS%>: Il;


LEXICON In

%<Psv%>:%-%(%{I%}%)n Pasv_CAT;
VR;


LEXICON In_CAT

%<VS%>: In;


LEXICON DIr

%<Caus%>:%-%{D%}%{I%}r CausA_CAT;
VR;


LEXICON DIr_CAT

%<VS%>: DIr;


LEXICON It

VR;
%<Caus%>:%-%(%{I%}%)t CausB_CAT;


LEXICON It_CAT

%<VS%>: It;


LEXICON Ir

%<Caus%>:%-%(%{I%}%)r CausA_CAT;
VR;


LEXICON Ir_CAT

%<VS%>: Ir;


LEXICON Ar

%<Caus%>:%-%{A%}r CausA_CAT;
VR;


LEXICON Ar_CAT

%<VS%>: Ar;


LEXICON NCP

VR;


LEXICON NCP_CAT

%<VS%>: NCP;


LEXICON RaR_CAT

%<VS%>: RaR;


LEXICON APP

%<Abil%>:%-%(y%)%{A%}bil Abil;
%<Abil%>:%-%(y%)%{A%} Abil-;
%<Pol%:Pos%>:%- Pol3;
%<Pol%:Neg%>:%-m%{A%} Pol2;


LEXICON RaR

%<Psv%>:%-%{I%}l Pasv_CAT;
%<Caus%>:%-%{D%}%{I%}r CausA_CAT;
APP;


LEXICON CausA

%<Caus%>:%-%(%{I%}%)t CausB_CAT;
APP;
%<Pasv%>:%-%{I%}l Pasv;


LEXICON Pasv

APP;


LEXICON CausB

APP;
%<Pasv%>:%-%{I%}l Pasv;


LEXICON TAMP2

 TAMP2Deriv;
%<Tns%:Aor%>:%-z T8;
%<Tns%:Aor%>:%- T9;


LEXICON Abil

%<Pol%:Pos%>:%- Pol1;


LEXICON Abil-

%<Pol%:Neg%>:%-m%{A%} Pol2;


LEXICON Pol1

TAMP3;
TAMP1;


LEXICON Prbl

TAMP3;
TAMP1;


LEXICON Pol3

%<Prbl%>:%-y%{A%}bil Prbl;
TAMP3;
TAMP1;


LEXICON Pol2

TAMP2;
%<Prbl%>:%-y%{A%}bil Prbl;
TAMP1;


LEXICON TAMP3

 TAMP3Deriv;
%<Tns%:Aor%>:%-%{I%}r T6;
%<Tns%:Aor%>:%-%{A%}r T6;


LEXICON TAMP1

 TAMP1Deriv;
%<Tns%:Imp%>:%- T1;
%<Tns%:Opt%>:%-%(y%)%{A%} T2;
%<Tns%:Cond%>:%-s%{A%} T3;
%<Tns%:Past%>:%-%{D%}%{I%} T4;
%<Tns%:Necc%>:%-m%{A%}l%{I%} T5;
%<Tns%:Pres%>:%-%(%{I%}%)yor T5;
%<Tns%:Iprf%>:%-m%{A%}kt%{A%} T5;
%<Tns%:Fut%>:%-%(y%)%{A%}c%{A%}%{K%} T5;
%<Tns%:Narr%>:%-m%{I%}ş T5;


LEXICON T1

%<Prsn%:2s%>:%- P1;
%<Prsn%:3s%>:%-s%{I%}n P1;
%<Prsn%:2p%>:%-%(y%)%{I%}n P1;
%<Prsn%:2p%>:%-%(y%)%{I%}n%{I%}z P1;
%<Prsn%:3p%>:%-s%{I%}nl%{A%}r P1;


LEXICON T2

%<Prsn%:1s%>:%-%(y%)%{I%}m P1;
%<Prsn%:2s%>:%-s%{I%}n P1;
%<Prsn%:3s%>:%- P1;
%<Prsn%:1p%>:%-l%{I%}m P1;
%<Prsn%:2p%>:%-s%{I%}n%{I%}z P1;
%<Prsn%:3p%>:%-l%{A%}r P1;
%<Cpl%:Narr%>:%-ym%{I%}ş Ca1;
%<Cpl%:Past%>:%-yd%{I%} Ca2;
%<Prsn%:3p%>:%-l%{A%}r P3;


LEXICON T3

%<Prsn%:1s%>:%-m P1;
%<Prsn%:2s%>:%-n P1;
%<Prsn%:3s%>:%- P1;
%<Prsn%:1p%>:%-k P1;
%<Prsn%:2p%>:%-n%{I%}z P1;
%<Prsn%:3p%>:%-l%{A%}r P1;
%<Cpl%:Narr%>:%-ym%{I%}ş Ca1;
%<Cpl%:Past%>:%-yd%{I%} Ca2;
%<Prsn%:3p%>:%-l%{A%}r P3;
%<Q%>:%-%{SPC%}m%{I%} Q1;


LEXICON T4

%<Prsn%:1s%>:%-m P1;
%<Prsn%:2s%>:%-n P1;
%<Prsn%:3s%>:%- P1;
%<Prsn%:1p%>:%-k P1;
%<Prsn%:2p%>:%-n%{I%}z P1;
%<Prsn%:3p%>:%-l%{A%}r P1;
%<Cpl%:Past%>:%-yd%{I%} Ca2;
%<Cpl%:Cond%>:%-ys%{A%} Ca2;
%<Prsn%:3p%>:%-l%{A%}r P4;
%<Q%>:%-%{SPC%}m%{I%} Q2;


LEXICON T5

%<Prsn%:1s%>:%-%(y%)%{I%}m P2;
%<Prsn%:2s%>:%-s%{I%}n P2;
%<Prsn%:3s%>:%- P2;
%<Prsn%:1p%>:%-%(y%)%{I%}z P2;
%<Prsn%:2p%>:%-s%{I%}n%{I%}z P2;
%<Prsn%:3p%>:%-l%{A%}r P2;
%<Cpl%:Narr%>:%-%(y%)m%{I%}ş Ca1;
%<Cpl%:Past%>:%-%(y%)%{D%}%{I%} Ca2;
%<Cpl%:Cond%>:%-%(y%)s%{A%} Ca2;
%<Prsn%:3p%>:%-l%{A%}r P5;
%<Cpl%:Aor%>:%-%{D%}%{I%}r Ca4;
%<Q%>:%-%{SPC%}m%{I%} Q3;


LEXICON P2

%<AsIf%>:%-%{C%}%{A%}s%{I%}n%{A%} Adv_CAT;
%<Cpl%:Aor%>:%-%{D%}%{I%}r Ca3;
#;


LEXICON T6

%<Cpl%:Narr%>:%-m%{I%}ş Ca1;
%<Cpl%:Past%>:%-%(y%)%{D%}%{I%} Ca2;
%<Cpl%:Cond%>:%-%(y%)s%{A%} Ca2;
%<Prsn%:3p%>:%-l%{A%}r P5;
%<Q%>:%-%{SPC%}m%{I%} Q1;


LEXICON T8

%<Cpl%:Narr%>:%-m%{I%}ş Ca1;
%<Cpl%:Past%>:%-%(y%)%{D%}%{I%} Ca2;
%<Cpl%:Cond%>:%-%(y%)s%{A%} Ca2;
%<Prsn%:3p%>:%-l%{A%}r P5;


LEXICON T9

%<Prsn%:1s%>:%-m P1;
%<Prsn%:1p%>:%-y%{I%}z P1;


LEXICON P1

%<AsIf%>:%-%{C%}%{A%}s%{I%}n%{A%} Adv_CAT;
#;


LEXICON Ca1

%<Prsn%:1s%>:%-%{I%}m P1;
%<Prsn%:2s%>:%-s%{I%}n P1;
%<Prsn%:3s%>:%- P1;
%<Prsn%:1p%>:%-%{I%}z P1;
%<Prsn%:2p%>:%-s%{I%}n%{I%}z P1;
%<Prsn%:3p%>:%-l%{A%}r P1;


LEXICON Ca2

%<Prsn%:1s%>:%-m P1;
%<Prsn%:2s%>:%-n P1;
%<Prsn%:3s%>:%- P1;
%<Prsn%:1p%>:%-k P1;
%<Prsn%:2p%>:%-n%{I%}z P1;
%<Prsn%:3p%>:%-l%{A%}r P1;


LEXICON Ca3

#;


LEXICON P3

%<AsIf%>:%-%{C%}%{A%}s%{I%}n%{A%} Adv_CAT;
%<Cpl%:Narr%>:%-m%{I%}ş Ca3;
%<Cpl%:Past%>:%-d%{I%} Ca3;
%<Q%>:%-%{SPC%}m%{I%} Q4;


LEXICON P4

%<AsIf%>:%-%{C%}%{A%}s%{I%}n%{A%} Adv_CAT;
%<Cpl%:Past%>:%-yd%{I%} Ca3;
%<Cpl%:Cond%>:%-ys%{A%} Ca3;
%<Q%>:%-%{SPC%}m%{I%} Q5;


LEXICON P5

%<AsIf%>:%-%{C%}%{A%}s%{I%}n%{A%} Adv_CAT;
%<Cpl%:Past%>:%-%(y%)%{D%}%{I%} Ca3;
%<Cpl%:Cond%>:%-%(y%)s%{A%} Ca3;
%<Cpl%:Narr%>:%-%(y%)m%{I%}ş Ca3;
%<Q%>:%-%{SPC%}m%{I%} Q4;
%<Q%>:%-%{SPC%}m%{I%} Q6;


LEXICON Ca4

%<Prsn%:3p%>:%-l%{A%}r P1;


LEXICON Q1

%<Cpl%:Narr%>:%-ym%{I%}ş Ca1;
%<Cpl%:Past%>:%-yd%{I%} Ca2;


LEXICON Q2

%<Cpl%:Past%>:%-yd%{I%} Ca2;


LEXICON Q3

%<Prsn%:1s%>:%-%(y%)%{I%}m P2;
%<Prsn%:2s%>:%-s%{I%}n P2;
%<Prsn%:3s%>:%- P2;
%<Prsn%:1p%>:%-%(y%)%{I%}z P2;
%<Prsn%:2p%>:%-s%{I%}n%{I%}z P2;
%<Prsn%:3p%>:%-l%{A%}r P2;
%<Cpl%:Narr%>:%-%(y%)m%{I%}ş Ca1;
%<Cpl%:Past%>:%-%(y%)%{D%}%{I%} Ca2;


LEXICON Q4

%<Cpl%:Narr%>:%-ym%{I%}ş Ca3;
%<Cpl%:Past%>:%-yd%{I%} Ca3;


LEXICON Q5

%<Cpl%:Past%>:%-yd%{I%} Ca3;


LEXICON Q6

%<Cpl%:Aor%>:%-%{D%}%{I%}r Ca3;


LEXICON CONJ

#;


LEXICON INTRJ

#;


LEXICON POSTP

#;
